Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1809
Failure to cooperate; effect.

Failure to cooperate with an investigation by the office may result in public disclosure of the failure to cooperate.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 43-4322;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 32.